Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2903
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Physical Therapy Practice Act, the definitions found in sections 38-2904 to 38-2918 apply.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 120;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,364;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 996.